Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

Third-Party Prescription Program Act

63-10-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Third-Party Prescription Program Act.”

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1051.

Compiler's Notes. Former parts 1 and 2 of this chapter, §§ 63-10-101 — 63-10-217 (Acts 1931, ch. 84, §§ 1-8, 11, 12, 14; 1939, ch. 36, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7002.1 — 7002.7, 7002.10 — 7002.13, 7002.16, 7002.17, 7002.19; Acts 1951, ch. 15, § 1; 1951, ch. 108, §§ 1-8; 1957, ch. 246, § 1; 1959, ch. 63, § 1; 1959, ch. 65, § 1; 1959, ch. 68, § 1; 1959, ch. 171, § 1; 1961, ch. 100, §§ 1-3, 5-8; 1961, ch. 101, §§ 1, 3-5; 1963, ch. 181, § 1; 1965, ch. 271, §§ 1, 2; 1967, ch. 16, § 1; 1967, ch. 17, § 1; 1968, ch. 18, § 1; 1970, ch. 412, §§ 1-3; 1970, ch. 413, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 414, § 1; 1970, ch. 415, § 1; 1970, ch. 431, § 1; 1971, ch. 79, §§ 1-5; 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1972, ch. 465, § 1; 1972, ch. 508, §§ 1-6; 1972, ch. 597, § 9; 1972, ch. 702, § 1; 1973, ch. 110, §§ §§ 1-13; 1974, ch. 466, §§ 1-5; 1976, ch. 591, §§ 1-9; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(116); 1977, ch. 66, § 8; 1977, ch. 180, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 906, § 40; 1979, ch. 84, § 3; 1979, ch. 257, §§ 1-9; 1980, ch. 451, §§ 10, 11; 1980, ch. 851, §§ 9, 10; 1981, ch. 38, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 358, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 63-1001 — 63-1008, 63-1010, 63-1011, 63-1013 — 63-1016, 63-1018 — 63-1026; Acts 1982, ch. 673, §§ 2-4; 1983, ch. 101, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 201, § 1; 1984, ch. 676, § 12; 1984, ch. 726, § 1; 1984, ch. 757, § 1; 1985, ch. 354, §§ 16-21, 31, 32; 1986, ch. 485, §§ 3-9; 1987, ch. 217, §§ 5-10; 1987, ch. 244, §§ 2, 4, 6; 1988, ch. 1013, § 48; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 35, 36; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 174-179, 182-185; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 1026, §§ 16-19, 46, 47; 1994, ch. 722, §§ 5-10; 1994, ch. 741, § 1; 1995, ch. 474, § 3; 1996, ch. 754; §§ 4, 5, concerning the board of pharmacy, were repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 2, effective January 1, 1997. For new provisions effective January 1, 1997, see part 2 of this chapter.

Law Reviews.

Thoughts on a Faded Peacock: The Effect of ERISA's Preemption Provision on State Third Party Prescription Drug Program Statutes (Richard M. Rindler and Evan Miller), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 23 (1986).

63-10-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, “program” and “third-party prescription program” mean any system of providing for the reimbursement of pharmaceutical services under a contractual arrangement or agreement between a provider of such services and another party who is not the consumer of those services. Such programs may include, but not be limited to, employee benefit plans whereby a consumer receives prescription drugs or other pharmaceutical services and those services are paid for by an agent of the employer or others.

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-1052; T.C.A. § 63-10-302.

63-10-103. Contract between pharmacy and program administrator.

Any agreement or contract entered into in this state between the program administrator of a third-party prescription program and a pharmacy shall include a statement of:

The method and amount of reimbursement to the pharmacy for services rendered to persons enrolled in such program;

The frequency of payment by such program administrator to the pharmacy for such services rendered; and

A method for the adjudication of complaints or the settlement of disputes between the parties.

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-1053; T.C.A. § 63-10-303.

63-10-104. Cancellation of program benefits.

The administrator of a program shall notify all pharmacies enrolled in such program of any cancellation of the coverage of benefits of any group enrolled in such program at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such cancellation. In those cases where the administrator of a program is not notified at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such cancellation, the administrator shall notify all pharmacies enrolled in such program of the cancellation as soon as practicable after having received such notice.

All persons enrolled in a program shall be notified of its cancellation, and the administrator of such program shall make every reasonable effort to gain possession of any plan identification cards such persons may have been issued pursuant to such program.

Any person who utilizes a program identification card to obtain services from a pharmacy after having received notice of the cancellation of the person's benefits shall be liable to the program administrator of such program for all moneys paid by such program administrator for any services received pursuant to the illegal use of such identification card.

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-1054; T.C.A. § 63-10-304.

63-10-105. Denying or withholding payment.

No program administrator shall deny payment for services to any pharmacy that may have resulted from the fraudulent or illegal use of an identification card by any person, unless the pharmacy has been notified that the card has been cancelled or discontinued and that the program administrator has been unsuccessful in attempting to regain possession of the card.

No program administrator shall withhold any payments to any pharmacy beyond the time period specified in the payment schedule provisions of the agreement, except that individual claims for payment may be returned to the pharmacy for cause, such as incomplete or illegible information, and may then be resubmitted by the pharmacy to the program administrator after the appropriate corrections have been made.

No program administrator shall deny or withhold payment to any pharmacy for duplicate prescription refills or prescription refills that are dispensed early in relation to the prior day's supply dispensed, where such refills are for the purpose of replacing lost or destroyed medication or providing the patient with the quantity necessary for extended travel away from the community in which the patient resides or for any other bona fide reason that causes the patient to be without medication, when the discontinuation of the medicine would, in the pharmacist's professional judgment, place the patient at risk of harm.

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 6; T.C.A., § 63-1055; Acts 1997, ch. 172, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-10-305.

63-10-106. Reimbursement rates.

No agreement between a program administrator and a pharmacy shall establish reimbursement rates or procedures that result in reimbursement rates for services rendered to persons covered by the plan that are less than the usual and customary rate charged by that vendor and paid by ordinary consumers for the same or similar services. This section does not apply to any agreements involving a pharmacy that is a member of an organized pharmacy network, such as a preferred provider organization (PPO) or a professional service administration organization (PSAO).

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 7; T.C.A., § 63-1056; Acts 1993, ch. 388, § 1; T.C.A. 63-10-306.

63-10-107. Applicability.

This part does not apply to any services rendered pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act of 1968, compiled in title 71, chapter 5, part 1.

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 9; T.C.A. § 63-1058; T.C.A. § 63-10-308; T.C.A. § 63–10–108.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-10-307 (now § 63-10-107) (Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-1057), concerning the institution, amendment or alteration of third-party prescription programs, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 388, § 2, effective May 17, 1993.

Former § 63-10-108 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

63-10-108. Price level determinations.

The commissioner of health, in cooperation with the board of pharmacy, shall determine the price level of prescriptions furnished under this part and those furnished otherwise. A determination shall also be made of the price level in other states having a program similar to that provided in this part and those that do not.

The commissioner shall prepare a comparison of the price level determinations required by this section no later than January 31 of each year and shall furnish copies of such comparison to committees of the general assembly.

Acts 1981, ch. 104, § 10; T.C.A. § 63-1059; T.C.A. § 63-10-309; T.C.A. § 63-10-109.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-10-109 was transferred to this section by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.

Former § 63-10-108 was transferred to § 63-10-107 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2017.